Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB784.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. For the purposes of this section, "virtual program" means a program
offered by a public school district in which all offered courses in the program are virtual,
do not include regular in-person instruction, and are designed as an alternative to
traditional in-person school programs. An independent school district with a virtual
program enrollment that is greater than 2,000 students on the date of this Act becoming
law shall not enroll more students in the district's virtual programs for the remainder of
the 2024-2025 school year and the entirety of the 2025-2026 school year than the
district's total enrollment in virtual programs on that date.
Section 2. Due to the time-sensitive budget planning process for districts to
determine the allocation of resources to support virtual and traditional instruction in
school districts, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its
passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/18/2025 10:23 AM Jacketed